Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4211
Medicare, defined.

Medicare means coverage under parts A and B of Title XVIII of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. 1395 et seq., as amended.

Laws 1985, LB 391, § 11;

Laws 2000, LB 1253, § 15.